Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB289.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 743. Radon Testing.--(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and thereafter as provided under this section : (1) Each existing school building shall be tested for radon gas.(2) If the test result is at least four (4) picocuries per liter of air, the school building shall be mitigated and retested until the radon levels are less than four (4) <--123456789101112131415161718 picocuries per liter of air.(b) The following shall apply to the initial testing of a school building's radon gas levels:(1) The initial testing of a school building's radon gas levels shall occur within one (1) year of the effective date of this clause or within one year of completion of the building's construction, whichever is later . (2) If the testing of a school building's radon gas levels does not identify any radon gas levels at or above four (4) picocuries per liter of air, the school building must be retested every five (5) years or when the school building receives major structural, foundational or HVAC renovations or repairs, whichever is sooner.(3) If the testing of a school building's radon gas levels identifies any radon gas levels at or above four (4) picocuries per liter of air, the school building must be retested every two (2) years.(c) Radon gas testing shall be performed in accordance with the version of ANSI-AARST MA-MFLB Protocol for Conducting Measurements of Radon and Radon Decay Products in Multifamily, School, Commercial and Mixed-Use Buildings in effect on the effective date of this subsection.(d) Radon gas testing shall be performed by an individual who is certified under the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.238, No.43), known as the "Radon Certification Act."(e) The following shall apply to radon gas mitigation:(1) If radon gas testing results for a room or occupied area in a school building indicate that the radon level is at least four (4) picocuries per liter of air, the school building shall be mitigated and retested until the radon levels are less than 20250HB0289PN3055 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 four (4) picocuries per liter of air.(2) Radon gas mitigation shall be performed by an individual who is certified under the "Radon Certification Act" by the Department of Environmental Protection. Retesting of mitigated buildings shall be performed as provided under clause (1) and every two (2) years thereafter by an individual who is certified under the "Radon Certification Act" by the Department of Environmental Protection . (3) Operation, maintenance and monitoring of the radon gas mitigation system shall comply with the radon mitigation standards provided under the current version of the ANSI-AARST SGM-MFLB Soil Gas Mitigation Standards for Existing Multifamily, School, Commercial and Mixed-Use Buildings in effect on the effective date of this clause.(4) Radon gas mitigation system installations shall be completed within six (6) months of confirmatory radon gas testing.(f) Initial radon testing results, mitigation plans and radon testing results conducted after radon mitigation shall be reported within sixty (60) days after the information has been received by the school entity as follows:(1) By presentation to the governing body of a school entity at a public meeting of the governing body of a school entity.(2) By communication by the governing body of a school entity to the parents' organization, if one exists.(3) By communication by the governing body of a school entity to the teachers' union or other employe organization.(4) By posting on the school district's publicly accessible Internet website and social media.(5) By submitting a report to the Radon Division of the 20250HB0289PN3055 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bureau of Radiation Protection of the Department of Environmental Protection, the State Board of Education, the Department of Education and the county health department.(g) Each new school building shall be built using radon-resistant new construction techniques according to the version of the ANSI-AARST CC-1000: Soil Gas Control Systems in New Construction of Buildings in effect on the effective date of this subsection . (h) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employe organization." As defined in section 1101-A."Governing body of a school entity." The board of school directors of a school district or any other governing entity of a school entity."HVAC." Heating, ventilation and air conditioning system."Parents' organization." An organized group, collective or agency of parents and legal guardians of the students in a school building or school entity."Radon." The radioactive noble gas radon 222."School entity." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, private school or nonpublic school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.AMENDING THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), ENTITLED "AN ACT RELATING TO THE PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM, INCLUDING CERTAIN PROVISIONS APPLICABLE AS WELL TO PRIVATE AND PAROCHIAL SCHOOLS; AMENDING, REVISING, CONSOLIDATING AND CHANGING THE LAWS RELATING THERETO," IN GROUNDS AND BUILDINGS, PROVIDING FOR RADON TESTING.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN 20250HB0289PN3055 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 743. RADON TESTING.--(A) A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL TEST EACH SCHOOL BUILDING FOR RADON GAS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING SCHEDULE:(1) AN INITIAL TEST SHALL BE COMPLETED AS FOLLOWS:(I) WITHIN ONE (1) YEAR OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH EXISTING SCHOOL BUILDING.(II) WITHIN ONE (1) YEAR OF COMPLETION OF CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW SCHOOL BUILDING.(2) RETESTING OF A SCHOOL BUILDING SHALL BE COMPLETED AS FOLLOWS:(I) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY FIVE (5) YEARS.(II) WITHIN SIXTY (60) DAYS, OR AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, OF THE COMPLETION OF THE INSTALLATION OF A RADON GAS MITIGATION SYSTEM REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (B).(III) NO SOONER THAN ONE (1) YEAR BUT NO MORE THAN TWO (2) YEARS AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE INSTALLATION OF A RADON GAS MITIGATION SYSTEM REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (B).(IV) WITHIN ONE (1) YEAR OF THE COMPLETION OF ANY MAJOR STRUCTURAL, FOUNDATIONAL OR HVAC RENOVATIONS OR REPAIRS TO THE SCHOOL BUILDING.(B) WITHIN ONE (1) YEAR, OR AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, OF A TEST UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OR (2) THAT IDENTIFIES RADON GAS LEVELS AT OR ABOVE FOUR (4) PICOCURIES PER LITER OF AIR, A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL COMPLETE THE INSTALLATION OF A RADON GAS MITIGATION SYSTEM IN THE AFFECTED SCHOOL BUILDING.(C) THE FOLLOWING STANDARDS SHALL APPLY:(1) RADON GAS TESTING SHALL BE PERFORMED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE VERSION OF ANSI-AARST MA-MFLB PROTOCOL FOR CONDUCTING 20250HB0289PN3055 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MEASUREMENTS OF RADON AND RADON DECAY PRODUCTS IN MULTIFAMILY, SCHOOL, COMMERCIAL AND MIXED-USE BUILDINGS IN EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(2) RADON GAS TESTING SHALL BE PERFORMED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS CERTIFIED UNDER THE ACT OF JULY 9, 1987 (P.L.238, NO.43), KNOWN AS THE "RADON CERTIFICATION ACT."(3) RADON GAS MITIGATION SHALL BE PERFORMED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS CERTIFIED UNDER THE "RADON CERTIFICATION ACT" BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION.(4) INSTALLATION, OPERATION, MAINTENANCE AND MONITORING OF THE RADON GAS MITIGATION SYSTEM SHALL COMPLY WITH THE RADON MITIGATION STANDARDS PROVIDED UNDER THE CURRENT VERSION OF THE ANSI-AARST SGM-MFLB SOIL GAS MITIGATION STANDARDS FOR EXISTING MULTIFAMILY, SCHOOL, COMMERCIAL AND MIXED-USE BUILDINGS IN EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS CLAUSE.(D) A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REPORT THE RESULTS OF RADON TESTS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) AND IF APPLICABLE PLANS FOR MITIGATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) WITHIN SIXTY (60) DAYS AFTER THE INFORMATION HAS BEEN RECEIVED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY AS FOLLOWS:(1) BY PRESENTATION TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY AT A PUBLIC MEETING OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY.(2) BY COMMUNICATION BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY TO THE PARENTS' ORGANIZATION, IF ONE EXISTS.(3) BY COMMUNICATION BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY TO THE TEACHERS' UNION OR OTHER EMPLOYE ORGANIZATION.(4) BY POSTING ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE AND SOCIAL MEDIA OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY.(E) A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL REPORT THE RESULTS, INCLUDING THE DATE MEASURED, OF RADON TESTS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) TO THE DEPARTMENT, IN A FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE 20250HB0289PN3055 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEPARTMENT, WITHIN SIXTY (60) DAYS AFTER THE INFORMATION HAS BEEN RECEIVED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY.(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN AND UPDATE AT LEAST QUARTERLY A LIST ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF THE MOST RECENT INFORMATION RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) BY SCHOOL BUILDING FOR EACH SCHOOL ENTITY.(G) INFORMATION POSTED PUBLICLY BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY OR THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT INCLUDE BUILDING PLANS OR INFRASTRUCTURE RECORDS THAT EXPOSE OR CREATE VULNERABILITY THROUGH THE DISCLOSURE OF THE LOCATION, CONFIGURATION OR SECURITY OF CRUCIAL SYSTEMS, INCLUDING:(I) PUBLIC UTILITY SYSTEMS.(II) STRUCTURAL ELEMENTS.(III) TECHNOLOGY.(IV) COMMUNICATION.(V) ELECTRICAL.(VI) FIRE SUPPRESSION.(VII) VENTILATION.(VIII) WATER.(IX) WASTEWATER.(X) SEWAGE.(XI) GAS SYSTEMS.(XII) OTHER INFORMATION THAT WOULD BE EXEMPTED FROM DISCLOSURE UNDER SECTION 708 OF THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 14, 2008 (P.L.6, NO.3), KNOWN AS THE "RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW ." (H) EACH NEW SCHOOL BUILDING SHALL BE BUILT USING RADON-RESISTANT NEW CONSTRUCTION TECHNIQUES ACCORDING TO THE VERSION OF THE ANSI-AARST CC-1000: SOIL GAS CONTROL SYSTEMS IN NEW CONSTRUCTION OF BUILDINGS IN EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.20250HB0289PN3055 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) ADDITIONAL COSTS INCURRED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY UNDER SUBSECTION (H) MAY NOT BE INCLUDED IN THE CALCULATION OF MAXIMUM PROJECT COST OR MAXIMUM CONSTRUCTION COST AS REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 701.1.(J) NO LATER THAN NINETY (90) DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET SHALL TRANSFER TO THE SCHOOL ENVIRONMENTAL REPAIRS PROGRAM RESTRICTED ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 2602-L TWENTY-SEVEN MILLION DOLLARS ($27,000,000) FROM AMOUNTS AVAILABLE IN SPECIAL FUNDS AND RESTRICTED ACCOUNTS. THE TRANSFERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET SHALL TRANSMIT TO THE STATE TREASURER A LIST OF AMOUNTS TO BE TRANSFERRED FROM SPECIAL FUNDS AND RESTRICTED ACCOUNTS TO THE SCHOOL ENVIRONMENTAL REPAIRS PROGRAM RESTRICTED ACCOUNT.(2) NO MONEY MAY BE TRANSFERRED FROM THE BUDGET STABILIZATION RESERVE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1701-A OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS "THE FISCAL CODE ." (3) UPON RECEIPT OF THE LIST UNDER CLAUSE (1), THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CAUSE THE TRANSFERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO OCCUR.(K) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 2603-L, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL USE THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (J) TO REIMBURSE SCHOOL ENTITIES FOR TESTING AND REMEDIATION AS FOLLOWS:(1) NO MORE THAN SEVEN MILLION DOLLARS ($7,000,000) SHALL BE USED TO REIMBURSE SCHOOL ENTITIES FOR DOCUMENTED COSTS RELATED TO COMPLETING THE INITIAL TESTING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(I) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING:(I) SUBJECT TO CLAUSE (4), THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE 20250HB0289PN3055 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REIMBURSEMENT EQUAL TO SEVENTY-FIVE PER CENTUM (75%) OF THE DOCUMENTED COSTS.(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE REIMBURSEMENTS ON A FIRST-COME, FIRST-SERVED BASIS SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDS UNDER CLAUSE (1).(III) TWO YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE ANY UNUSED OR UNCOMMITTED FUNDS UNDER CLAUSE (1) FOR THE PURPOSES OF CLAUSE (2).(2) NO LESS THAN TWENTY MILLION DOLLARS ($20,000,000) SHALL BE USED TO REIMBURSE SCHOOL ENTITIES FOR DOCUMENTED COSTS RELATED TO COMPLETING THE INSTALLATION OF A RADON GAS MITIGATION SYSTEM IN AN AFFECTED SCHOOL BUILDING AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING:(I) SUBJECT TO CLAUSE (4), THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE REIMBURSEMENT EQUAL TO SEVENTY-FIVE PER CENTUM (75%) OF THE DOCUMENTED COSTS.(II) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE REIMBURSEMENTS FOR ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED SCHOOL ENTITIES.(3) REIMBURSEMENT REQUESTS, INCLUDING DOCUMENTED COSTS, SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(4) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AWARD, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, A REQUEST BASED ON THE MERITS OF THE DOCUMENTED COSTS.(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH A LIST OF REIMBURSEMENTS PAID ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(L) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH.20250HB0289PN3055 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "EMPLOYE ORGANIZATION." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1101-A."GOVERNING BODY." THE BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT OR ANY OTHER GOVERNING ENTITY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY."HVAC." HEATING, VENTILATION AND AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM."PARENTS' ORGANIZATION." AN ORGANIZED GROUP, COLLECTIVE OR AGENCY OF PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS OF THE STUDENTS IN A SCHOOL BUILDING OR SCHOOL ENTITY."RADON." THE RADIOACTIVE NOBLE GAS RADON 222."SCHOOL BUILDING." A BUILDING OWNED BY OR UNDER THE CONTROL OF A SCHOOL ENTITY WHERE CLASSES ARE TAUGHT OR EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES ARE CONDUCTED ON A REGULAR BASIS."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL, INTERMEDIATE UNIT OR AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 120 DAYS.20250HB0289PN3055 - 10 - 123456789101112131415